Utah statutes.
17-36-5.   Creation of Citizens and County Officials Advisory Committee.
(1)  For the purpose of this act there is created a Citizens and County
Officials Advisory Committee appointed by the state auditor composed of the
following persons:
(a)  five county auditors elected to that specific and exclusive position;
(b)  five county treasurers elected to that specific and exclusive position;
(c)  two citizens with expertise in the area of local government and the needs
and problems of such government;
(d)  four additional elected county officers, one of whom shall be from the
five largest counties in the state and one of whom shall be from the five
smallest counties in the state; and
(e)  such other members as the auditor considers appropriate.
(2) (a)  Except as required by Subsection (2)(b), the terms of committee
members shall be four years each.
(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the state auditor
shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms
to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that
approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.
(3)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement
shall be appointed for the unexpired term.
(4)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's
service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:
(a)  Section 63A-3-106;
(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and
(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(5)  The advisory committee shall assist, advise, and make recommendations to
the state auditor in the preparation of a uniform system of county budgeting,
accounting, and reporting.
